Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.254

Abatement, extermination declared necessity and benefit to land.

It is hereby declared that whenever the public necessity or welfare has required the formation of a mosquito control district, the abatement or extermination of mosquitoes within the district is of direct, economic benefit to the land located within such district and is necessary for the protection of the public health, safety and welfare of those residing therein.

[ 1959 c 64 s 6.]